Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1001
State Anatomical Board; members; powers and duties; State Anatomical Board Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The heads of the anatomy departments of the medical schools and colleges of this state, one professor of anatomy appointed by the head of the anatomy department from each medical school or college of this state, one professor of anatomy appointed from each dental school or college of this state, and one layperson appointed by the Department of Health and Human Services shall constitute the State Anatomical Board of the State of Nebraska for the distribution, delivery, and use of certain dead human bodies, described in section 71-4834, to and among such schools, colleges, and persons as are entitled thereto under such section.

(2) The board shall have power to (a) establish rules and regulations for its government and for the collection, storage, and distribution of dead human bodies for anatomical purposes and (b) appoint and remove its officers and agents.

(3) The board shall keep minutes of its meetings and shall cause a record to be kept of all of its transactions, of bodies received and distributed by it, and of the school, college, or person receiving every such body. The records of the board shall be open at all times to the inspection of each member of the board and to every county attorney within this state.

(4) There is hereby created the State Anatomical Board Cash Fund. The fund shall be under the University of Nebraska Medical Center for accounting and budgeting purposes only. The fund shall consist of revenue collected by the State Anatomical Board and shall only be used to pay for costs of operating the board. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1929, c. 158, § 1, p. 551;

C.S.1929, § 71-2801;

R.S.1943, § 71-1001;

Laws 1969, c. 570, § 1, p. 2314;

Laws 1978, LB 583, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 98, § 2;

Laws 1992, LB 860, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 556;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 464;

Laws 2017, LB331, § 36;

Laws 2019, LB559, § 1.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.